Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-6503
In-home personal services agency; duties.

An in-home personal services agency shall employ or contract with only persons who meet the requirements of section 71-6502 to provide in-home personal services. The in-home personal services agency shall perform or cause to be performed a criminal history record information check on each in-home personal services worker and a check of his or her driving record as maintained by the Department of Motor Vehicles or by any other state which has issued an operator's license to the in-home personal services worker, when driving is a service provided by the in-home personal services worker, and shall maintain documentation of such checks in its records for inspection at its place of business.

Laws 2007, LB236, § 41.